src/fst/stems/correlatives.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+Kor !Correlative
    +Quest  !Question
    +Indic  !Indication
    +Indef  !Indefinite
    +Univ   !Universal
    +Neg    !Negative

    +Qual   !Quality
    +Reas   !Reason
    +Time   !Time
    +Place  !Place
    +Mann   !Manner
    +Assoc  !Association
    +Thing  !Thing
    +Amt    !Amount
    +Indiv  !Individual


LEXICON Root
Kor+head;    !null root for correlatives (korelativoj)

LEXICON Kor+head
+Quest:ki   tail;   !Question
+Indic:ti   tail;   !Indication
+Indef:i    tail;   !Indefinite
+Univ:ĉi    tail;   !Universal
+Neg:neni   tail;   !Negative

!ki      Kor;    !'Question'
!ti      Kor;    !'Indication'
!i       Kor;    !'Indefinite'
!ĉi      Kor;    !'Universal'
!neni    Kor;    !'Negative'

!LEXICON Kor
!+Kor: Kor-suff;

LEXICON tail
+Qual:a     #;
+Reas:al    #;
+Time:am    #;
+Place:e    #;
+Mann:el    #;
+Assoc:es   #;
+Thing:o    Number;
+Amt:om     #;
+Indiv:u    Number;

!Nouns
LEXICON Number
+Sing: Case; !Singular
+Plu:j Case; !Plural

LEXICON Case
+Nom:    #; !Nominative
+Acc:n   #; !Accusative
